Washington statutes.
RCW 18.340.030

Authority duties and recommendations—Person to assist—Member training.

(1) Each authority must identify a contact or coordinator within the authority to assist military spouse applicants and licensees.

(2) Each authority must provide training to each board or commission member on the culture of military spouses, the military spouse experience, and issues related to military spouse career paths. Board or commission members appointed on or before October 1, 2023, must complete the training by January 1, 2024. Board or commission members appointed after October 1, 2023, must complete the training within 90 days after appointment. The department of veterans affairs shall create an internet-based training that may be used by each authority to satisfy this requirement.

(3) Each authority is encouraged to:

(a) Appoint a military spouse to serve on its licensing board or commission;

(b) Conduct a review of the authority's licensing application process for military spouses and identify barriers to military spouse employment; and

(c) Review licensing fees and related expenses and identify possible ways to reduce costs for military spouses.

[ 2023 c 165 s 5.]

NOTES:

Short title—Finding—Intent—2023 c 165: See notes following RCW 18.340.020.